California statutes. Education Code
Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the governing board of a school district or county superintendent of schools may establish regulations which allow their classified employees to reduce their workload from full-time to part-time duties.

The regulations shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following, if classified employees wish to reduce their workload and maintain retirement benefits pursuant to Section 20819 of the Government Code:

(a) The classified employee shall have reached the age of 55 prior to reduction in workload.

(b) The classified employee shall have been employed full time in a classified position for at least 10 years of which the immediately preceding five years were full-time employment.

(c) During the period immediately preceding a request for a reduction in workload, the classified employee shall have been employed full time in a classified position for a total of at least five years without a break in service.

(d) The option of part-time employment shall be exercised at the request of the classified employee and can be revoked only with the mutual consent of the employer and the classified employee.

(e) The classified employee shall be paid a salary which is the pro rata share of the salary he or she would be earning had he or she not elected to exercise the option of part-time employment but shall retain all other rights and benefits for which he or she makes the payments that would be required if he or she remained in full-time employment.

The classified employee shall receive health benefits as provided in Section 53201 of the Government Code in the same manner as a full-time classified employee.

(f) The minimum part-time employment shall be the equivalent to one-half of the number of hours of service required by the classified employee’s contract of employment during his or her final year of service in a full-time classified position.

(g) The period of the part-time classified employment shall not exceed five years.

(h) The period of the part-time classified employment shall not extend beyond the end of the school year during which the classified employee reaches his or her 70th birthday.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 658, Sec. 1.   Effective September 12, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Management and Confidential Employees [45140. - 45140.]

45140.

The governing board of any school district which has not adopted the merit system pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 45220) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) may contract with temporary-help employment agencies to fill vacancies of management and confidential employees without the necessity of complying with the requirements of this part.

The contracts for the services of temporary-help agency employees under this section shall not exceed 60 working days per position per approved leave period, not to exceed two per year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 823, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Salaries [45160. - 45169.]

45160.

The governing board of any school district, including city boards of education, shall fix and order paid the compensation of persons a part of the classified service and other employees not requiring certification qualifications employed by the board unless otherwise prescribed by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45162.

(a) The governing board of any school district shall, not later than the date prescribed by law for approval of the publication budget of every year, fix the annual salaries for the ensuing school year for all persons employed by the district in positions not requiring certification qualifications. The governing board may, at the time, include an increase in such annual salaries, all or part of which increase is conditional upon the actual receipt by the district of anticipated revenue from all sources. If the revenue actually received is less than that anticipated, the governing board may, at any time during the school year, reduce such annual salaries by an amount not to exceed the amount which was granted subject to the receipt of such revenues.

(b) The governing board of a school district may, at any time during the school year, increase the salaries of persons employed by the district in positions not requiring certification qualifications. Such increase shall be effective on any date ordered by the governing board.

(c) A governing board may, at any time, increase the wages or salaries of classified employees if the board or, in a merit system district, the personnel commission approves a classification change in a position, a class of positions, or any or all of the positions or classes of positions a part of the classified service.

(d) The provisions of this section shall not be construed to permit a governing board to demote or dismiss an employee as a result of reclassification of a position or class of positions except as may otherwise be permitted by law.

(e) This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 53.)
-------------------------------------------

45163.

If the governing board of a school district cannot comply with the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 45162 because it is engaged in a study, which was commenced prior to the commencement of the school year, to increase the salaries and wages of persons employed by such district in positions not requiring certification qualifications, the board may, by appropriate action taken prior to the final adoption of its budget, do either of the following:

(a) Adopt an interim salary schedule which shall be the same schedule as for the preceding year, except that increases may be granted at that time based upon increased cost-of-living indexes, and provide that the salaries and wages fixed as a result of the study shall be payable for the entire school year to include the period thereof in which the study was conducted and final board action taken.

(b) Provide that the salaries and wages fixed as a result of the study shall be effective only for that portion of the school year, as determined by the board at the time it takes action after the study has been completed. “Portion of the school year,” as used in this subdivision shall not be for any period of time less than the period of time remaining in the school year from the date the governing board adopts the salary schedule based on the study commenced prior to that school year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45165.

The governing board of any school district not paying the annual or monthly salaries of persons employed by the district in 12 equal monthly payments may withhold, upon election by the individual employee, from each payment made to such employee an amount as follows:

(a) For an employee employed 11 months of a year an amount equal to 813 percent thereof and the total amount deducted to be paid not later than the 10th day of September next succeeding.

(b) For an employee employed 10 months of a year an amount equal to 1623 percent thereof and the total amount deducted to be paid in two equal monthly installments not later than the 10th day of August and the 10th day of September next succeeding.

(c) For an employee employed nine months a year an amount equal to 25 percent thereof and the total amount deducted to be paid in three equal monthly installments not later than the 10th day of July, the 10th day of August and the 10th day of September next succeeding.

If the provisions of Section 42644 are made applicable to any district the provisions of this section shall apply except that the amount deducted from each regular pay period and ultimate dates for payment of the amount deducted shall be computed and set in accordance with the system adopted under Section 42644.

Once an employee has elected to be brought under the provisions of this section such election shall not be revocable until the commencement of the next ensuing fiscal year. However, in the event any employee leaves the service of the district by death or otherwise before receiving such moneys as may be due him, the amount due him shall be paid within 30 days of the last working day to him or any other person entitled thereto by law.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45166.

Orders for the payment of wages and payroll orders and warrants for the payment of wages of employees a part of the classified service in any public school system shall be drawn at least once during each calendar month, for those districts not using the provisions of Sections 42644, 42645, or 42646 of this code. Such payment shall be made on the last working day of the month in which the employee was in paid status.

This section shall not prohibit a school district from making a payment of earned salary prior to the last working day of the pay period or of the month.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45167.

Whenever it is determined that an error has been made in the calculation or reporting in any classified employee payroll or in the payment of any classified employee’s salary, the appointing authority shall, within five workdays following such determination, provide the employee with a statement of the correction and a supplemental payment drawn against any available funds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45168.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the governing board of each public school employer when drawing an order for the salary or wage payment due to a classified employee of the employer may, without charge, reduce the order by the amount that it has been requested in a revocable written authorization by an employee who is a member of the bargaining unit to deduct for the payment of dues in, or for any other service provided by, any employee organization or bona fide association, whose membership consists, in whole or in part, of employees of that employer, and that has as one of its objectives improvements in the terms or conditions of employment for the advancement of the welfare of those employees. Any revocation of a written authorization shall be in
 writing and shall be effective provided the revocation complies with the terms of the written authorization.

(2) The revocable written authorization shall remain in effect until expressly revoked in writing by the employee in accordance with the terms of the authorization. Whenever there is an increase in the amount required for the payment to the employee organization, the employee organization shall provide the employee with adequate and necessary data on the increase at a time sufficiently before the effective date of the increase to allow the employee an opportunity to revoke the written authorization, if desired and permitted by the terms of the written authorization. The employee organization shall provide the school district with notification of the increase at a time sufficiently before the effective date of the increase to allow the employer an opportunity to make the necessary changes and with a copy of the notification of the
 increase that has been sent to all concerned employees.

(3) Upon receipt of a properly signed authorization for payroll deductions by a classified employee pursuant to this section, the governing board shall reduce the employee’s pay warrant by the designated amount in the next pay period after the governing board receives the notification.

(4) The governing board shall, on the same designated date of each month, draw its order upon the funds of the employer in favor of the employee organization designated by the employee for an amount equal to the total of the respective deductions made with respect to the employee organization during the pay period.

(5) The governing board shall not require the completion of a new deduction authorization when a dues increase has been effected or at any other time without the
 express approval of the concerned employee organization.

(6) The governing board shall honor the terms of the employee’s written authorization for payroll deductions. Employee requests to cancel or change authorizations for payroll deductions for employee organizations shall be directed to the employee organization rather than to the governing board. The employee organization shall be responsible for processing these requests. The governing board shall rely on the information provided by the employee organization to cancel or change authorizations, and the employee organization shall indemnify the public school employer for any claims made by the employee for deductions made in reliance on that information.

(7) A classified or recognized employee organization that certifies that it has and will maintain individual employee authorizations shall not be required to submit to the
 governing board of a public school employer a copy of the employee’s written authorization in order for the payroll deductions described in this section to be effective, unless a dispute arises about the existence or terms of the written authorization. The employee organization shall indemnify the public school employer for any claims made by the employee for deductions made in reliance on its notification.

(b) The governing board of each public school employer when drawing an order for the salary or wage payment due to a classified employee of the employer may, without charge, reduce the order for the payment of dues to, or for any other service provided by, the certified or recognized employee organization of which the classified employee is a member, or for the payment of service fees to the certified or recognized employee organization as required by an organizational security arrangement between the exclusive representative and a public
 school employer as provided under Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code. However, the organizational security arrangement shall provide that any employee may pay service fees directly to the certified or recognized employee organization in lieu of having the service fees deducted from the salary or wage order.

(c) This section shall apply to public school employers that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 53, Sec. 2.   (SB 866)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

45168.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the governing board of a school district that collects or deducts dues, agency fees, fair share fees, or any other fee or amount of money from the salary of a classified employee for the purpose of transmitting the money to an employee organization shall transmit the money to the employee organization within 15 days of issuing the paycheck containing the deduction to the employee.

(b) (1) This section does not limit the right of an employee organization or affected employee to sue for a failure of the employer to transmit dues or fees pursuant to this section.

(2) In an action brought for a violation of subdivision (a), the court may award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to the prevailing party if any party to the action requests attorney’s fees and costs.

(c) This section applies to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240).

(d) A school district or county office of education may not request, and the state board may not grant, a waiver of compliance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 920, Sec. 8.   (SB 913)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

45169.

Upon initial employment and upon each change in classification thereafter, each classified employee shall be furnished two copies of his class specification, salary data, assignment or work location, together with duty hours and the prescribed workweek. The salary data shall include the annual, monthly or pay period, daily, hourly, overtime and differential rate of compensation, whichever are applicable. One copy shall be retained by the employee and the other copy shall be signed and dated by the employee and returned to his supervisor.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to short-term, limited-term, or provisional employees, as those terms are defined in this chapter.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Differential Compensation [45180. - 45186.]

45180.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply unless the context indicates otherwise:

(a) “Differential compensation” means either a reduction in the number of hours required to be actually worked or an increase in salary.

(b) “Shift” means the number of hours worked and shall include a duty-free meal period of not less than one-half hour which, in the case of a seven- or eight-hour shift, shall occur approximately at the midpoint of the shift. This subdivision shall not apply to employees working six hours or less, or assigned to a split shift.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45181.

The governing board of every school district, or the personnel commission in any merit system school district, shall, insofar as it is possible to do so, determine the practices relating to morning and night shift salary differentials in the private employment fields in which it must compete for employees for its classified staff and shall consider the advisability of providing comparable salary differentials for its classified staff.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45182.

The governing board of any school district may provide differential compensation to those classified employees who perform duties of a distasteful, dangerous, or unique nature when, in the opinion of the board, such compensation is reasonably justified.

In a merit system district, such differentials shall be based upon findings and recommendations of the personnel commission and shall not be applied in a manner contrary to the principle of like pay for like service.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45183.

(a) Assignment of duties to bargaining unit employees for which differential compensation is designated, other than a temporary assignment of less than 20 working days, shall be made on the basis of seniority among those employees within the appropriate class who request such an assignment.

(b) This section may be waived by agreement between the governing board of a school district and the exclusive representative of the unit of classified employees to be affected by the waiver.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 652, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

45184.

No employee assigned to work a shift entitled to differential compensation shall be demoted in class or grade as a result of such an assignment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45185.

An employee receiving differential compensation on the basis of his shift shall not lose such compensation if he is temporarily, for 20 working days or less, assigned to a shift not entitled to such compensation. The regular rate of pay for all purposes of an employee assigned to a shift which provides differential compensation shall be the differential rate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45186.

This article shall apply to school districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Resignation and Leaves of Absence [45190. - 45210.]

45190.

(a) Governing boards of school districts may grant voluntary leaves of absence and vacations, with or without pay, to persons employed in the classified service of the district.

(b) If a school district places an employee on an involuntary leave of absence during the period the employee is charged with a criminal offense, is under a criminal investigation, or is waiting due to administrative delay for necessary job-related administrative determinations, then upon the conclusion of the proceedings in favor of the employee, the school district shall pay to the employee the employee’s full compensation for the period of the involuntary leave of absence upon the employee’s return to service in the school district. For purposes of
 this subdivision, “involuntary leave of absence” includes, but is not limited to, a compulsory leave of absence or a suspension. This subdivision shall not reduce any entitlement to paid leave or replace any relevant procedures under any other law.

(c) This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 331, Sec. 1.   (AB 472)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

45191.

(a) (1) Every classified employee employed five days a week by a school district shall be entitled to 12 days leave of absence for illness or injury and such additional days, in addition thereto, as the governing board may allow for illness or injury, exclusive of all days the classified employee is not required to render service to the school district, with full pay for a fiscal year of service.

(2) A classified employee, employed five days a week, who is employed for less than a full fiscal year is entitled to that proportion of 12 days leave of absence for illness or injury as the number of months the classified employee is
 employed bears to 12 and the proportionate amount, consistent with this formula, of such additional days, in addition thereto, authorized by the governing board for classified employees employed five days a week for a full fiscal year of service.

(3) A classified employee employed less than five days per week shall be entitled, for a fiscal year of service, to that proportion of 12 days leave of absence for illness or injury as the number of days the classified employee is employed per week bears to five and is entitled to the proportionate amount, consistent with this formula, of such additional days, in addition thereto, authorized by the governing board for classified employees employed five days a week for a full fiscal year of service. When such persons are employed for less than a full fiscal year of service this and the preceding
 paragraph shall determine that proportion of leave of absence for illness or injury to which they are entitled.

(4) Pay for any day of absence described in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, shall be the same as the pay which would have been received had the employee served during the day. Credit for leave of absence need not be accrued before taking such leave by the employee and such leave of absence may be taken at any time during the year. However, a new employee of a school district shall not be eligible to take more than six days, or the proportionate amount to which the employee may be entitled under this section, until the first day of the calendar month after completion of six months of active service with the district.

(b) If the employee does not take the full amount of leave allowed
 in any year under this section the amount not taken shall be accumulated from year to year with such additional days as the governing board may allow.

(c) The governing board of each school district shall adopt rules and regulations requiring and prescribing the manner of proof of illness or injury for the purpose of this section. Such rules and regulations shall not discriminate against evidence of treatment and the need therefor by the practice of the religion of any well-recognized religious sect, denomination, or organization.

(d) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a school district or districts, governed by the same governing board, in which the combined average daily attendance of all school districts is in excess of 250,000, provided those school districts maintain
 sick leave policies not less than those in effect in those school districts on January 1, 1961.

(e) This section shall apply to school districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 920, Sec. 9.   (SB 913)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

45191.5.

(a) (1) In addition to any other entitlement for leave of absence for illness or injury with pay, a classified employee hired on or after, or employed on or after, January 1, 2017, who is a former active duty member of the Armed Forces of the United States or a former or current member of the California National Guard or a federal reserve component, with a service-connected disability rated at 30
 percent or more by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, shall be entitled to leave of absence for illness or injury with pay of up to 12 days for the purpose of undergoing medical treatment, including mental health treatment, for his or her service-connected disability.

(2) Credit for leave of absence for illness or injury granted under this subdivision shall be credited to a qualifying classified employee on the effective date of the employee’s disability rating decision from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, or on the first day the qualifying classified employee begins, or returns to, employment after active duty, whichever is later, and shall remain available for use for the following 12 months of employment.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), credit for leave of absence for illness or injury granted under this subdivision shall be credited to a
 classified employee on the date the employee receives confirmation of submission of his or her disability application to the United States Department of Veterans Affairs. When the classified employee receives his or her disability rating decision from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, the employee shall report that information to the employer. If the classified employee’s disability rating decision makes the employee ineligible pursuant to paragraph (1), the employer may change the leave of absence for illness or injury time used before the disability rating decision to an alternative leave balance. If the classified employee’s disability rating decision makes the employee eligible pursuant to paragraph (1), the employee shall be entitled to 12 days for the purpose of undergoing medical treatment, including mental health treatment, for his or her service-connected disability minus the time used before the disability rating decision, for the 12-month period beginning with the confirmation of
 submission of his or her disability application.

(4) Leave of absence for illness or injury credited pursuant to this subdivision that is not used during the 12-month period shall not be carried over and shall be forfeited.

(5) Submission of satisfactory proof that a leave of absence for illness or injury granted under this subdivision is used for treatment of a service-connected disability may be required pursuant to rules adopted by the governing board of a school district.

(b) A classified employee, as described in subdivision (a) and employed five days per week, who is employed for less than a full fiscal year, is entitled
 to that proportion of 12 days’ leave of absence for illness or injury granted pursuant to subdivision (a) as the number of months he or she is employed bears to 12.

(c) A classified employee, as described in subdivision (a), employed less than
 five days per week, shall be entitled to that proportion of 12 days’ leave of absence for illness or injury granted pursuant to subdivision (a) as the number of days he or she is employed per week bears to five. When such persons are employed for less than a full fiscal year of service, this subdivision and subdivision (b) shall determine that proportion of leave of absence for illness or injury granted pursuant to subdivision (a) to which they are entitled.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish the obligation of a public school employer to comply with any collective bargaining agreement entered into by a public school employer and an exclusive bargaining representative pursuant to Chapter 10.7
 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code that provides greater leave of absence rights to employees than the rights established under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 597, Sec. 2.   (SB 731)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

45192.

(a) The governing board of a school district shall provide by rules and regulations for industrial accident or illness leaves of absence for employees who are a part of the classified service. The governing board of a school district that is created or whose boundaries or status is changed by an action to organize or reorganize school districts completed after the effective date of this section shall provide by rules and regulations for these leaves of absence on or before the date on which the organization or reorganization of the school district becomes effective for all purposes.

(b) The rules and regulations shall include the following provisions:

(1) Allowable leave shall not be for less than 60
 working days in any one fiscal year for the same accident.

(2) Allowable leave shall not be accumulative from year to year.

(3) Industrial accident or illness leave will commence on the first day of absence.

(4) Payment for wages lost on any day shall not, when added to an award granted the employee under the workers’ compensation laws of this state, exceed the normal wage for the day.

(5) Industrial accident leave will be reduced by one day for each day of authorized absence regardless of a compensation award made under workers’ compensation.

(6) When an industrial accident or illness occurs at a time when the full 60 days will overlap into the next fiscal year, the employee shall be
 entitled to only that amount remaining at the end of the fiscal year in which the injury or illness occurred, for the same illness or injury.

(c) The industrial accident or illness leave of absence is to be used in lieu of entitlement acquired under Section 45191. When entitlement to industrial accident or illness leave has been exhausted, entitlement or other sick leave will then be used, but if an employee is receiving workers’ compensation, the employee shall be entitled to use only so much of his or her accumulated or available sick leave, accumulated compensating time, vacation, or other available leave as, when added to the workers’ compensation award, will provide for a full day’s wage or salary.

(d) The governing board of a school district may, by rule or regulation, provide for as much additional leave of absence, paid or unpaid, as it deems appropriate and during this
 leave the employee may return to his or her position without suffering any loss of status or benefits. The employee shall be notified, in writing, that available paid leave has been exhausted, and shall be offered an opportunity to request additional leave.

(e) A period of leave of absence, paid or unpaid, shall not be considered to be a break in service of the employee.

(f) During a paid leave of absence, whether industrial accident leave as provided in this section, sick leave, vacation, compensated time off, or other available leave provided by law or the action of the governing board of a school district, the employee shall endorse to the school district wage loss benefit checks received under the workers’ compensation laws of this state. The school district, in turn, shall issue the employee appropriate warrants for payment of wages or salary and shall deduct normal
 retirement and other authorized contributions. Reduction of entitlement to leave shall be made only in accordance with this section.

(g) When all available leaves of absence, paid or unpaid, have been exhausted and if the employee is not medically able to assume the duties of his or her position, the employee shall, if not placed in another position, be placed on a reemployment list for a period of 39 months. When available, during the 39-month period, the employee shall be employed in a vacant position in the class of the employee’s previous assignment over all other available candidates except for a reemployment list established because of lack of work or lack of funds, in which case the employee shall be listed in accordance with appropriate seniority regulations.

(h) The governing board of a school district may require that an employee serve or have served continuously a
 specified period of time with the school district before the benefits provided by this section are made available to the employee but this period shall not exceed three years and all service of the employee before the effective date of this section shall be credited in determining compliance with the requirement.

(i) In the absence of rules and regulations adopted by the governing board of a school district, pursuant to this section, an employee shall be entitled to industrial and accident or illness leave as provided in this section but without limitation as to the number of days of this leave and without any requirement of a specified period of service.

(j) An employee who has been placed on a reemployment list, as provided in this section, who has been medically released for return to duty and who fails to accept an appropriate assignment shall be dismissed.

(k) This section applies to school districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 63.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

45193.

The governing board of any school district may provide for such leave of absence from duty as it deems appropriate for any female employee in the classified service of the district who is required to absent herself from her duties because of pregnancy or convalescence following childbirth, and may adopt rules and regulations prescribing the manner of proof of pregnancy, the time during pregnancy at which the leave of absence shall be taken, and the length of time for which the leave of absence shall continue after birth of the child. The board may also provide in the rules and regulations whether leave granted under this section shall be with or without pay and, if with pay, the amount, if any, to be deducted from the salary due the employee for the period in which the absence occurs. However, nothing in this section shall be construed so as to
 deprive any employee of sick leave rights under other sections of this code for absences due to illness or injury resulting from pregnancy.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 82.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 83 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 65.)
-------------------------------------------

45193.

(a) (1) A public school employer shall provide for a leave of absence from duty for an employee in the classified service of the public school employer who is required to be absent from duty because the employee is experiencing or has experienced pregnancy, miscarriage, childbirth, termination of pregnancy, or recovery from those conditions. The length of the leave of absence, including the date on which the leave shall commence and the date on which the employee shall resume duties, shall be determined by the employee and the employee’s physician. Except as provided in paragraph (2), the leave of absence shall be with full pay, subject to a maximum of 14 weeks. The paid leave may begin before and continue after childbirth if the employee is actually disabled by pregnancy, childbirth,
 termination of pregnancy, or related medical conditions.

(2) For part-time employees in the classified service, the amount of paid leave per week, subject to a maximum of 14 weeks, shall be calculated in accordance with the following:

(A) If the part-time employee works a fixed number of hours per week, the employee shall receive weekly pay for the total number of hours the employee is normally scheduled to work for the public school employer.

(B) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), if the part-time employee does not work a fixed number of hours per week, the employee shall receive weekly pay in an amount equaling the employee’s average weekly pay during the six-month period immediately preceding the date that the employee began their paid leave.

(ii) If the part-time employee has been employed for less than six months, the employee shall receive weekly pay in an amount equaling the employee’s average weekly pay during the entire period of that employment preceding the date that the employee began their paid leave.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law, a public school employer shall maintain group health coverage for an employee who takes a leave of absence under this section for the duration of the leave of absence at the same level and under the same conditions that coverage would have been provided if the employee had not taken a leave of absence.

(4) A leave of absence taken under this section shall not be deducted from any other leaves of absence available to the employee for subsequent injury, illness, or disabilities, including those caused or contributed to by
 pregnancy, miscarriage, or childbirth, pursuant to state or federal regulations or laws, except as provided in subdivision (e).

(5) Compensation during the leave of absence taken under this section shall include retirement fund contributions required of the public school employer. The employee shall earn full service credit during the leave of absence and shall pay member contributions to the retirement fund.
